Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-117.08
License; suspend, cancel, or revoke; hearing; conviction; court; duty.

The license of any licensee who violates any of the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall be suspended, canceled, or revoked. If any licensee violates the regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission or any lawful ordinance of the local governing body, the commission may, after proper hearing, suspend, cancel, or revoke the license. If any licensee is convicted of a violation of the terms of the act, the court shall immediately notify the local governing body and the commission.

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 13.

The authority of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission to cancel a liquor license is set forth in section 53-116.01 and this section. Each of these sections gives the commission authority to revoke, cancel, or suspend a liquor license where, after a proper hearing, the licensee has been found to have violated a provision of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, a regulation adopted pursuant to the act, or a lawful ordinance of a local governing body. Grand Island Latin Club v. Nebraska Liq. Cont. Comm., 251 Neb. 61, 554 N.W.2d 778 (1996).